Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 1

General Provisions

10-1-101. Division of public libraries and archives.

A division of public libraries and archives is hereby created within, and administratively attached to, the office of the secretary of state. The authority, powers, and duties formerly vested by law in the commissioner of education shall be vested in the secretary of state and are to be administered through and by the division of public libraries and archives. The division shall have transferred and attached to it:

The office of state historian; and

All historical and memorial commissions and associations created by act of the general assembly and expending public funds, for purposes of administration, except the Tennessee historical commission.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; 1975, ch. 143, § 2; T.C.A., § 10-101; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 1; 1984, ch. 728, § 2; 2008, ch. 631, § 2.

Cross-References. County historian, § 5-18-101.

Divisions of state department of education, § 49-1-202.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Historical commission, title 4, ch. 11, part 1.

Tennessee historical commission, attachment to department of environment and conservation for administrative purposes, § 11-1-101.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1057.

An American Tragedy: E-Books, Licenses, and the End of Public Lending Libraries? 66 Vand. L. Rev. 615 (2013).

10-1-102. [Reserved.]

The state library system shall consist of the existing state library, archives, regional library for accessible books and media and library extension properties and services, and such other properties and services as may from time to time be assigned to the division of public libraries and archives, excluding the law library of the state, which functions under the direction of the supreme court.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2 (Williams, § 2278.3); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; Acts 1976, ch. 458, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-103; Acts 2018, ch. 543, § 1.

10-1-104. Functions of the secretary of state, acting through the division of public libraries and archives.

The functions of the secretary of state, acting through the division of public libraries and archives, shall include the following:

Collecting, preserving, and providing public access to archival material and materials of historical, documentary, and reference value, and literary works or printed matter that may be considered by the division of special interest to the citizenship of this state;

The distribution and exchange of publications of the state that may become available from time to time;

The collection and distribution of reference material to state officials and employees and public agencies that may be entitled to the reference material;

The encouragement of library development throughout the state by means of advice, guidance, and library extension services, in the course of which the division is empowered to enter into local, regional, or interstate contracts with competent agencies in the furtherance of library services. The contracts are subject to the prior approval by the secretary of state; and

Other functions that may be designated and authorized from time to time or that may properly belong to the administration of an up-to-date library and archives for the state.

The enumeration of the specific items in subsection (a) shall not be deemed to exclude any other activities that the division may think proper to be handled by it and by the state librarian and archivist.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 2278.1, 2278.2); 1959, ch. 9, § 12; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(47); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-102; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 2; 1984, ch. 851, § 1; 2008, ch. 631, § 4; 2017, ch. 126, § 1.

Cross-References. Copies of acts deposited, § 12-6-103.

Depository of public documents, §§ 12-6-107, 12-6-108, 12-6-109, 12-6-110, 12-6-111, 12-6-112.

Exchange of public documents, § 12-6-113.

Preservation of historical records, § 18-1-204.

10-1-105. Administration of system — Custody of properties — Policies, rules and regulations regarding governance and use.

The secretary of state, acting through the division of public libraries and archives, shall be responsible for the proper administration of this chapter, and shall establish policies to govern the administration of the state library system. The division shall have custody of and be responsible for the properties of the state library system, including properties that may be assigned to it in the future. The secretary of state is authorized to establish policies, rules, and regulations that may be necessary to govern the use of the properties and the use and disposition of materials under the secretary's jurisdiction, including the circulation of books from the library.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2 (Williams, § 2278.5); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-105; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 5; 2008, ch. 631, § 5.

10-1-106. Development of program — Budget.

The secretary of state shall develop a state library program calculated to meet the needs of the state and the requirements of its citizens for such services. The secretary of state shall annually prepare and submit to the governor and to the general assembly a budget consistent with such program and shall operate the state library system within the financial resources available. The secretary of state shall take appropriate action each year to encourage adoption of the budget proposal.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2 (Williams, § 2278.5); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-106; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 6; 2008, ch. 631, § 6.

10-1-107. Personnel — Funds for training and education.

The secretary of state has the authority to create positions necessary to effectively carry on library programs. The secretary of state is authorized to make appointments or dismissals to positions deemed necessary to conduct the affairs of the library program.

The secretary of state is authorized to expend funds for the special training and formal education of library personnel; provided, that the personnel shall agree to work in the state library system for at least two (2) years after the completion of the training and education.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2 (Williams, § 2278.5); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; Acts 1965, ch. 223, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-107; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 7; 1984, ch. 728, § 3; 2008, ch. 631, § 7.

Cross-References. Public records commission, members, § 10-7-302.

10-1-108. Cooperation with other agencies — Legislative intent — Construction.

The secretary of state has the authority to call upon other state agencies for information, publications and related material needed to discharge the secretary's duties, and may confer and cooperate with other agencies, whether federal, state or local, in order to more effectively carry out the program. It is the legislative intent that this chapter shall be broadly construed and applied in the interest of making the state library function to the best advantage of the citizenship of the state.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 3 (Williams, § 2278.7); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-110; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 8; 2008, ch. 631, § 8.

10-1-109. Administering funds and materials.

The secretary of state is authorized to accept and administer funds or material made available for library, archival and historical purposes from public or private sources either by grant, bequest, donation or otherwise, and this may include any available grants from the federal government or cooperation with the federal government in the advancement of library activities when agreements to that effect are approved.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 4 (Williams, § 2278.8); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-111; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 9; 1984, ch. 728, § 4; 2008, ch. 631, § 9.

10-1-110. People with disabilities.

The secretary of state is authorized to:

Cooperate with the division for the blind and physically handicapped in the library of congress in planning and conducting a program of bringing free reading materials and related services and other library services to people with disabilities, as defined by the library of congress, who are residents of the state;

Establish and implement eligibility and certification standards and rules and regulations for these services;

Produce and distribute, and contract with competent organizations and agencies for the production and distribution of reading materials, and related library services, in the conduct of this program;

Cooperate in making sound reproduction equipment and other reading equipment available to people with disabilities, as defined by the library of congress; and

Establish and maintain local or regional centers as the library of congress may designate for the loan of reading materials, reproducers and other library materials to eligible readers in the state; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with or supersede the rules and regulations of the library of congress in the loan of library materials and reading equipment for people with disabilities, as defined by the library of congress.

Acts 1976, ch. 458, § 2; T.C.A., § 10-114; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 10; 2008, ch. 631, § 10; 2018, ch. 543, §§ 2-4.

10-1-111. Black history.

The secretary of state, acting upon the recommendation of the state librarian and archivist, is hereby authorized to contract with the Beck Cultural Exchange Center, Knoxville, for the appropriate deposit, display, and/or preservation at the center of such:

Archival material;

Historical, documentary, and reference materials; and

Literary works or printed matters;

as may be mutually deemed by the secretary of state and by the center to be of special interest to the black citizens of Tennessee.

The terms of any such contract shall ensure that adequate steps are undertaken to protect and preserve all such items for the benefit of future Tennesseans.

Acts 1983, ch. 245, § 1; 2008, ch. 631, § 11.